North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
ARTICLE XIII COMPACT WITH THE UNITED STATES

The following article shall be irrevocable without the consent of the United States and the people of this state:

Section 1. [Toleration of religious sentiment]

Perfect toleration of religious sentiment must be secured, and no inhabitant of this state may ever be molested in person or property on account of that person’s mode of religious worship.

Section 2. [Military reservations]

Jurisdiction is ceded to the United States over the military reservations of Fort Abraham Lincoln, Fort Buford, Fort Pembina, and Fort Totten, heretofore declared by the president of the United States; provided, legal process, civil and criminal, of this
state, extends over those reservations in all cases in which exclusive jurisdiction is not vested in the United States, or of crimes not committed within the limits of those reservations. The legislative assembly may provide, upon
the terms and conditions it adopts, for the acceptance of any jurisdiction as may be delegated to the state by act of Congress.

Section 3. [Land grants]

The state of North Dakota hereby accepts the several grants of land granted by the United States to the state of North Dakota by an Act of Congress entitled “An act to provide for the division of Dakota into two states, and to enable the people of North
Dakota, South Dakota, Montana and Washington to form constitutions and state governments, and to be admitted into the union on equal footing with the original states, and to make donations of public lands to such states,” under the
conditions and limitations therein mentioned; reserving the right, however, to apply to Congress for modification of said conditions and limitations in case of necessity.

Section 4. [Continuation of provisions of Enabling Act]

All other provisions of the Enabling Act of Congress approved on February 22, 1889, 25 United States Statutes at Large 676, chapter 180, and section 1 of this article of the Constitution of North Dakota, as section 1 existed immediately before the adoption
of this section, are continued in effect as though fully recited and continue to be irrevocable without the consent of the United States and the people of this state.